Utah statutes.
61-2f-502.   Definitions.

For purposes of this part:

(1)  "Civil judgment" means a judgment in a civil action that:

(a)  is awarded in an action brought against a real estate licensee on the basis of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in a real estate transaction; and

(b)  awards actual damages.

(2)  "Criminal restitution judgment" means a judgment that, in accordance with the Utah Code of Criminal Procedure, orders criminal restitution to a person and against a real estate licensee for a criminal offense involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in a real estate transaction.

(3)  "Final judgment" means one of the following judgments upon termination of the proceedings related to the judgment, including appeals:

(a)  a civil judgment; or

(b)  a criminal restitution judgment.

(4)  "Fund" means the Real Estate Education, Research, and Recovery Fund created in Section 61-2f-503.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

